Idaho, session 2025, H0228.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 74-203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-203. GOVERNING BODIES -- REQUIREMENT FOR OPEN PUBLIC MEETINGS. (1)
Except as provided below, all meetings of a governing body of a public agency
shall be open to the public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any
meeting except as otherwise provided by this act. No decision at a meeting of
a governing body of a public agency shall be made by secret ballot.
(2) Deliberations of the board of tax appeals created in chapter 38, ti-
tle 63, Idaho Code, the public utilities commission and the industrial com-
mission in a fully submitted adjudicatory proceeding in which hearings, if
any are required, have been completed, and in which the legal rights, duties
or privileges of a party are to be determined are not required by this act to
take place in a meeting open to the public. Such deliberations may, however,
be made and/or conducted in a public meeting at the discretion of the agency.
(3) Meetings of the Idaho life and health insurance guaranty associa-
tion established under chapter 43, title 41, Idaho Code, the Idaho insurance
guaranty association established under chapter 36, title 41, Idaho Code, and
the surplus line association approved by the director of the Idaho depart-
ment of insurance as authorized under chapter 12, title 41, Idaho Code, are
not required by this act to take place in a meeting open to the public.
(4) A governing body shall not hold a meeting at any place where dis-
crimination on the basis of race, creed, color, sex, age or national origin
is practiced.
(5) All meetings may be conducted using telecommunications devices
which enable all members of a governing body participating in the meeting to
communicate with each other. Such devices may include, but are not limited
to, telephone , video conferencing, or internet website devices and similar
communications equipment. Participation by a member of the governing body
through telecommunications devices shall constitute presence in person by
such member at the meeting; provided however, that at least one (1) member
of the governing body, or the director of the public agency, or the chief ad-
ministrative officer of the public agency shall be physically present at the
location designated in the meeting notice, as required under section 74-204,
Idaho Code, to ensure that the public may attend such meeting in person. The


communications among members of a governing body must be audible to the pub-
lic attending the meeting in person and the members of the governing body.
(6) All meetings shall allow for public comment either in person or via
telephone, video conferencing, or internet website devices and similar com-
munications equipment and subject to the following:
(a) In each instance where notice of the time of the meeting is oth-
erwise given or the agenda for the meeting is otherwise posted, the
governing body shall also give notice of the means by which members of
the public may access the meeting and offer public comment. The agenda
shall identify and include an opportunity for all persons to attend via
telephone, video conferencing, or internet website.
(b) In the event of a disruption that prevents the governing body from
broadcasting the meeting to members of the public using the telephone,
video conferencing, or internet website option, or in the event of a
disruption within the governing body's control that prevents members
of the public from offering public comments using the telephone, video
conferencing, or internet website option, the governing body shall take
no further action on items appearing on the meeting agenda until public
access to the meeting via the telephone, video conferencing, or inter-
net website option is restored.
(c) The governing body shall not require public comments to be submit-
ted in advance of the meeting.
(d)(i) A governing body that provides a timed public comment pe-
riod for each agenda item shall not close the public comment period
for the agenda item or the opportunity to register to provide pub-
lic comment until that timed public comment period has elapsed.
(ii) A governing body that does not provide a timed public comment
period, but takes public comment separately on each agenda item,
shall allow a reasonable amount of time per agenda item to allow
public members the opportunity to provide public comment or other-
wise be recognized for the purpose of providing public comment.
(iii) A governing body that provides a timed general public com-
ment period that does not correspond to a specific agenda item
shall not close the public comment period or the opportunity
to register until the timed general public comment period has
elapsed.
(e) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a special meet-
ing held pursuant to section 74-204(2), Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 74-207, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-207. OPEN LEGISLATIVE MEETINGS REQUIRED. All meetings of any
standing, special or select committee of either house of the legislature of
the state of Idaho shall be open to the public at all times, except in extra-
ordinary circumstances as provided specifically in the rules of procedure
in either house, and any person may attend any meeting of a standing, spe-
cial or select committee, but may participate in the committee only with the
approval of the committee itself; however, the public shall have the oppor-
tunity to comment at any such meeting as provided in section 74-203(6), Idaho
Code.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.